cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/js/vendor/speak/dictsource/lv_rules
//o  
                o       (L06    o
                o       (bam	o
        _)      o       (blig   o
                o       (bje    o
        _)      o       (bs	o
        _)      o       (dek    o
                o       (dere   uo
                o       (derē   uo
                o       (dia    o
        _)      odo             odo
        _)      odo     (s_     uoduo      
        _)      odio            odio:  
                o       (i	o
                o       (kāl    o
                o       (ke     o
        okean)  o               o
                okok    (L03_   okok    // ..okoks
       _)       o       (ksanL04_  o    // Oksana     
                o       (ksi    o 
                o       (kto    o
                o       (kup	o
                o       (kul	o    
                o       (ksol	o
                o       (kt     o
        okt)    o               o:
       _oks)    o       (lL03_  o:      // oksols  	
       _)       o       (ksf	o       // Oksforda
        okstr)  o	        o
        _)      o       (lL04_+ uo      // ola
                o       (lig	o
        _)      o       (lafL03_ o      // Olafs
                o       (leo    o
        _)      o       (lgL04_ o       // Olga
        _)      o       (ļegL03_ o      // Oļegs
                o       (līv	o
                o       (limp	o
                o       (log	o
                o       (loģ	o
        _)      o       (ndatr  o       
        ol)     o       (nij    o:
        ol)     o       (nist   o:
                o       (lL03_+ o:      // ..ols
                o       (mār    o   
        omb)    o               o       
                o       (mnib   o
                omot    (o      omot  
        _)      o       (ms     o:
        _)      o       (mi     o:
                o       (ng	o
                o       (nko	o
                o       (pL03_+ o:      // ..ops                
                o       (nL03_+ o:      // ..ons
                o       (no     o
        on)     o               o
                o       (nto    o
        ont)    o               o        
                oo	        oo:
        _)      o       (perL04_ o:      // opera    
        _)      o       (per    o
                o       (perat  o
        op)	o	        o
                o       (pc     o
    	        o       (po	o
    	        o       (ptik	o
 	        o       (ptiķ	o
    	        o       (ptim	o
    	        o       (ptis	o    	
       _)       opto	        opto  
                o       (rāk    o
        orat)   o	        o:
                o       (ran+   o	        
                o       (rat 	o  
                o       (rāt 	o  
        _)      o       (rL05_  uo      // ore
                o       (rd     o
                o       (rhid   o      
                o       (rig 	o
                o       (riģ	o
    	        o       (rg	o
    	        o       (rien   o
                o       (rk	o                
                o       (rķ	o
    	        o       (rnit	o
    	        o       (rto	o
  	        o       (rL03_+ o:      //..ors 
        ort)	o	        o
        ortod)  o       (k	o
                o       (scil   o
                o       (smo	o    	
       _)       o       (skarL03_ o     // Oskars
        osm)	o	        o:
        osm)	o       (g	o
                o       (st_    uo   
                osto    (L10    uostuo  
        ot)     o       (pL03_  o:      // ..otops 
        ost)    o       (pL03_  o       // ..ostops
                o       (šņ     uo
        _)      oto             oto
    	        o       (u	o
        _)      o       (vāc    o        
    	        o       (zon	o
                o       (zL07_+ o:      // ..oze
                ozo     (lL03_  uozuo   // ..ozols
                o       (zL03_  o:      // ..ozs

//p
        par)    o       (d      o
        paran)  o               o
        pant)   o               o
       _pask)   o       (pL03_  uo      // paskops
        patri)  o               o:
        pērk)   o       (n	uo
        pērk)   o       (ņ	uo
        pers)   o       (n	o:	  
       _pil)    o       (t_     uo      // pilot
        pil)    o       (t      o
        pir)    o               o
        pl)	o       (m	o
        pl)	o       (vL03_	o       // plovs
        plut)   o       (k      o
        pneim)  o               o:
        p)      o       (de     o
        p)      o       (e      o
        p)      o       (ē      o
        p)	o       (la	o
        polar)	o       	o
        p)	o       (lā	o
        p)      o       (lem    o
        p)	o       (li	o
       _p)	o       (lijL04_ uo     // Polija
       _p)      o       (lL05_  uo      // polis
       _p)      o       (lie    uo 
       _p)      o       (lied   o 
       _p)      o       (ļ      uo      
        p)	o       (lī	o
        p)	o       (lL07_  o:	// ..pole
        p)	o       (lL03_  o:	// ..pols
        p)      olo     (_      o:lo:   // ..polo
        p)	o       (lo	o
        p)	o       (lst	o
        p)      o       (mer    o
        p)      o       (mp     o
        p)      o       (nc     o
       _p)      o       (nijL03_ o      // ponijs        
        pont)   o       (n      o:
        pomp)   o               o:
        prop)	o 	        o
       _p)      o       (pL07_  uo      // Pope 
        p)      o       (p      o
        p)	o       (ra	uo
        p)	o       (rc	o
        p)	o       (ro	o
        p)      orno            oR2no
        p)	o       (rt 	o  
        por)	o	        o
        p)      o       (stam   o        
        p)      o       (stem   o
        p)      o       (sten   o
        p)      o       (ster   o
        p)	o       (stī	uo
        p)      o       (stm    o
        p)	o       (sto	uo
        p)      o       (stso   o
        p)	o       (stul	o
       _p)      o       (tašL04 o       // potaša
        p)      o       (ten    o
        p)	o       (z	o
        pr)	o       (c	o
        pr)	o       (b	o
        pr)	o       (d	o
        pr)	o       (gn 	o    
        pr)	o       (gr 	o
       _pr) 	o       (jām_	uo      // projām
        pr) 	o       (j	o
        pr)     o       (sp     o
        pr)     o       (viz    o
        pr)     o       (vīz    o
        pr) 	o       (ž	o
        pr)	o       (k 	o      
        pr) 	o       (le	o
       _pr) 	o       (m_	uo      // prom
       _pr) 	o       (mes	uo      // promesošs
       _pr) 	o       (mb	uo      // prombūtne
        pr)     o       (m      o
        pr)	o       (p	o
        pr)     o       (st     o
        pr)     o       (te     o	
        pr)     o       (to     o
        prot)   o               o
        prot)   oko             oko:
        pr)	o       (vin	o  
        pr)	ovo	        ovo  
        pseid)  o               o
        pt)     o       (mL03_  o:      // ..ptoms

//r
        radi)	o	        o:
        raiv)   o       (_	o       // Raivo
        raps)   o               o:	
       _rāp)    o       (_      uo
        ras)    o       (l      o
       _ram) 	o       (nL04_	o:      // Ramona
        raz)	o	        o
        retr)   o               o
        rd)     o       (mL03_  o:
        rib)    oso             oso:
        rib)    o       (nuk    o
        riev)   o               uo
        ring)	o	        o
        r)	o       (bež	uo
       _r)      o       (bert   o
       _r)	obo     (t_	uobuo   // ..robot..
        r)	obo     (t	obo
        r)      odo     (den    odo
       _r)      o       (derikL03_ o    // Roderiks
       _r)      o       (kādL07_ o      // rokāde 
        r)      oko     (pe     oko:
        r)      o       (ktu    uo
        r) 	o       (l 	o
       _r)      o       (mL04_  uo      // Roma
        r)      o       (ma     o
        r)      o       (mā     o
        r)      o       (mb     o
        r)	o       (r	o
        r)	o       (sij	o
        r)	o       (stb	o
        r)      o       (ter    o
        r)      o       (tē	o
        r)      o       (zL07_  uo      // ..roze
       _r)      o       (zīnL07_ o      // rozīne
       _r)      o       (zetL07_ o      // rozete

//s
        sab)    o       (t      o
        sark)	o	        o     
        scen)   o               o
        seism)  o               o
        sērf)   o               uo
        si)	o	        o
        sinhr)  o               o
        sink)   o               o:
        sīp)	ol      (L03_   uol	// sīpols
        skler)  o               o:
        sk)     o       (lL04_  uo      // ..skola
        sk)     o       (l      uo
        sk)     olo             uoluo   // ..skolo..
        skol)   o       (L09    uo      
        skol)   o       (L10    uo      
       _sk)     o       (pL03_  uo    	//  skops
        sk)     o       (pL03_  o:	// ..skops
        sk)     o       (pijL04_ o:	// ..skopija
        sk)     o       (pis    o:
        slav)   o               o      
        sl)	o       (gL03_  uo	// slogs
        sl)	o       (go	uo	// slogot
        slog)	o 	        uo
        sl)     o       (v      o
       _sm)     o       (gL03_  o:      // smogs
        sm)     o       (ļ      o       // from Russian
        sm)	o       (k	uo
        s)      o       (ci     o
        s) 	o       (ko	o
        sok)	o 	        o	
        s)	o       (kr     o
        s)      o       (lar    o
        s)      o       (lār    o
        s)	o       (līL10	uo      // ..solīt../..solīd..
        s)	o       (līdL03_ o      // solīds 
        s)      o       (līdā   o
        s)      o       (lid    o
        s) 	o       (lf	o
        s)      o       (lo	o:
        s)      o       (loģ    o
        s)	o       (lL03_	uo	// sols
        s)	o       (lL05_	uo	// solis
        sol)    o 	        o:
        s)	o       (loš	uo
        sol)	o       (s_	uo
        sol)	o       (š	uo
        s)	o       (lot	uo
        sol)	o       (t	uo
        sol)	o       (t_	uo 
        s)	o       (lst	o  
        s)	o       (lt	o  
        s)      o       (lv     o
        s)      o       (nā     o  
        s)	o       (no	o
        son)	o	        o
        s)      o       (pr     o
        s)      o       (rL07_++ o:     // ..sore
        s)	o       (rL03_+ o:	// ..sors
        s)	o       (r	o
        s)      o       (v      o
       _spīd)   o       (lL04_  uo      // Spīdola
        spid)   o               o
        sp)	o       (n	o
        sp)	o       (rt	o
        sport)	o       	uo
        spr)    og    	        uog      
        spr)    ost    	        uost  
        sten)   o       (L09    uo
        sten)   o       (L10    uo
       _sten)   o               o
        sten)	o       (g	o
       _ster)	o	(s_     uo      // steros    
        ster)	o	        o   
        st)     o       (kh     o   
        st)	o       (mat	o
        st)     o       (po     uo
       _str)	o       (pL03_  uo  	// strops 
       _st)	o       (rL07_  uo  	// store 
        svītr)  o               uo
        š)	o       (sej	o
        šalk)	o 	        uo	// ..šalko..
        šan)	o	        uo
        šl)     o       (gL03_  uo      // (iekš)log
       _šķ)     o       (rL05_  uo      // šķore
       _šņ)     o       (rL05_  uo      // šņore
        š)	o       (k	o
        šok)	o       	o
       _š)      o       (rtL11  o       // šorti
       _š)      o       (ziem_  uo      // šoziem
